en: Transport case type: Hard case; Semi-rigid bag; Soft bag; Other
pl: Typ futerału transportowego: Futerał twardy; Torba półsztywna; Miękka torba; Inne
fr: Type de housse de transport: Étui rigide; Sac semi-rigide; Sac souple; Autre
nb: Transportkassetype: Hard koffert; Halvstiv veske; Myk veske; Annet
zh-CN: 运输盒类型: 硬壳; 半硬包; 软包; 其他
el: Τύπος θήκης μεταφοράς: Σκληρή θήκη; Ημίσκληρη τσάντα; Μαλακή τσάντα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta transportnega kovčka: Trdi kovček; Poltrda torba; Mehka torba; Drugo
ja: 輸送ケースタイプ: ハードケース; セミハードバッグ; ソフトバッグ; その他
ru: Тип транспортировочного кейса: Жесткий футляр; Полужесткая сумка; Мягкая сумка; Другое
hu: Szállítótáska típusa: Kemény tok; Félkemény táska; Puha táska; Egyéb
ko: 운송 케이스 유형: 하드 케이스; 반경질 가방; 소프트 가방; 기타
sv: Typ av transportväska: Hårt fodral; Halvhård väska; Mjuk väska; Övrigt
da: Type af transportetui: Hård kuffert; Halvhård taske; Blød taske; Andet
it: Tipo di contenitore per il trasporto: Custodia rigida; Borsa semirigida; Borsa morbida; Altro
pt-BR: Estojo de transporte tipo: Estojo rígido; Bolsa semirrígida; Bolsa maleável; Outro
th: ประเภทกล่องขนส่ง: เคสแข็ง; กระเป๋ากึ่งแข็ง; กระเป๋านุ่ม; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de caja de transporte: Estuche rígido; Bolso semirrígido; Bolso suave; Otro
sk-SK: Typ dopravného puzdra: Tvrdé puzdro; Polotuhá taška; Mäkká taška; Iné
tr: Koli tipi taşıma: Sert çanta; Yarı sert çanta; Yumuşak çanta; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de caixa de transporte: Estojo rígido; Saco semirrígido; Saco maleável; Outro
bg-BG: Тип транспортен калъф: Твърд калъф; Полутвърда чанта; Мека чанта; Друго
nl: Transportkoffer type: Hardcase; Halfstijve tas; Zachte tas; Overig
ro-RO: Tipul cutiei de transport: Carcasă rigidă; Geantă semirigidă; Geantă moale; Altele
zh-TW: 運輸箱類型: 硬殼箱; 半硬殼袋; 軟袋; 其他
fi: Kuljetuskotelon tyyppi: Kova kotelo; Puolijäykkä laukku; Pehmeä laukku; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta transportne kutije: Tvrdi kovčeg; Polutvrda torba; Mekana torba; Ostalo
de: Art des Transportkoffers: Hartschalenkoffer; Halbstarre Tasche; Softbag; Sonstige
cs: Typ transportního obalu: Pevné pouzdro; Polopevná taška; Měkká taška; Jiné
vi: Loại hộp vận chuyển: Hộp cứng; Túi bán cứng; Túi mềm; Khác
lt-LT: Transporto dėžės tipas: Kietas dėklas; Pusiau kietas krepšys; Minkštas krepšys; Kita